Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3862.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the
commissioner of conservation and recreation, may enter into a 99-year lease with the Town of
Plymouth, for the fields and facilities, together with the land and appurtenances of the Pilgrim
Memorial Park which is located at 79 Water Street, Plymouth. The 99-year lease may provide for
improvements to the field and facilities, together with the land and appurtenances. The 99-year
lease executed under this section shall be on terms, conditions and consideration acceptable to
the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance, in consultation with the
commissioner of conservation and recreation; provided, however, that the 99-year lease shall
provide that: (i) the Town of Plymouth shall provide general oversight for land, facilities, fields
and appurtenances associated therewith during the term of the 99-year lease; (ii) the Town of
Plymouth shall carry comprehensive general liability insurance naming the commonwealth as a
co-insured, protecting the commonwealth against all claims for personal injury or property
damage arising from or on land and appurtenances associated therewith during the term of the
of 2

lease; (iii) the Pilgrim Memorial Park shall be accessible to the general public when not in use by
permittees; (iv) the Town of Plymouth shall not design or construct any facilities on the parcel
without the written approval of the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance
and the commissioner of conservation and recreation; (v) the Town of Plymouth shall be
responsible for all utility costs, subject to the 99-year lease, and for the general day-to-day
maintenance of the Pilgrim Memorial Park; and (vi) the Town of Plymouth shall have sole
responsibility for developing rules and regulations and fees for the use of Pilgrim Memorial
Park.
of 2